Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202653-165.03
Sponsorship or advertising agreement; authorized, when.

(1) A manufacturer, a wholesaler, or any agent of a manufacturer or wholesaler may enter into a sponsorship or advertising agreement with (a) the holder of a special designated license pursuant to section 53-124.11 that is a municipal corporation, a fine arts museum incorporated as a nonprofit corporation, a religious nonprofit corporation exempted from payment of federal income taxes, a political organization exempted from payment of federal income taxes, or any other nonprofit corporation the purpose of which is fraternal, charitable, or public service and which has been exempted from payment of federal income taxes, (b) a political subdivision of the State of Nebraska, or (c) an operator of property owned by a political subdivision of the State of Nebraska, to sponsor and advertise for events held by such organization, licensee, or political subdivision.

(2) The commission may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out this section.

Laws 2023, LB376, § 7.